patterns/hyph-sk-slabika.tex
ve4sti
vet3l
vet3r
vet3v
1vev
ve4zd
ve4z3m
veš3p
vh2
2v1ha
4v3hoď
2v1hr
2v1hu
2v1há
2vhĺ
2vhŕ
v4i
vi4a
1vib1
vie4kt
1vig
vi4k3l
vi4k3r
1vio
vi4sť
3vitnej
3vitnel
3vitnie
1viu
1viv
3vizi
1viá
1vií
2v1k2
4vka
4vke
3v4kla
4vko
3v4kra
3v4kro
4vkro.
3v4krá
3v4kus
4vky
4vká
v3lam
v4lh
4vliv
2vly
2v1lí
2vm
v1ma
v1me
3v4mieš
v1my2
v1mý
2v1n
v4nad
v4naď
4vnej
v4nes
vno3stu
3vnád
4vné
4vníc
4vník
4vníč
3vnúč
vod4o
vo3d4r
vo3d4v
voh2
vo4h3r
vojpo4sc
vok3l
vo4k3r
voo2
voos4
vo1p2
4vorné
vo4r3uh
vo3sle
vo3slá
vos3p
vo3sta
vot4k
vo4tko
vo4tku
vo4tm
vo4v3lá
vo3z4h
vo3zj
vo3zl
vo3zni
vo3z4o
vo3z4r
vo3z4v
vo3š4t
v4pad
4vpaľ
4vpaš
4v3ple
4v3pli
2v1po
2v1pr
v4pu
4vpus.
4vpusť
4v3páľ
2vpí
v3rab
v3ran
v3ravc
4v3raz
v3raň
vr4bľ
vr3dlo
4vre.
v3rej
v3rin
vr4s
vrs3tve
vrs3tvo
vrti3e
v3rán
4v3ráz
2v1rí
v4rúc
1vs2
v4sad
4vsaj
4vsak
4vsal
4vsaď
4vsať
2vsi
4v1sk
v1sm
2vso
3v4sta
3v4stu
3v4stá
v4stú
2vsu
2vsy
v4sád
4vsáv
2vsú
2vsý
v2t4
4vte.
vu1c
2vuk
vupo4
vus2
vu3sm
vu3s4tr
vu1ľ
vym2
vy3p4n
vy3s4
vyt2
vy3tn
vyz2
vy3č2
vyš4t
1vz4
vzo3p4
v2zá
v2zý
válo3
3várač
1víc
1ví1d
1víg
vô2d
1vý1c
1výn
výs2
vý3ska
1vý3z4
vý3š4ľ
2v1č
v4čas
3v2čl
v2čm
1vď
4vň
1vš2
vše3s
v4šet
4všij
4všil
v4šim
4všit
4všiť
2všo
2všu
4všív
2v1ž2
1xa
x1b
x1c
1xe
xek3v
2xf
x1h
1xi
xis3k
xis3l
2x1k4
x1l
x1m
2x1n
1xo
xo3du
x1p2
xpo4s3
x1r
x1s2
2x1t
1xu
1xá
1xé
1xí
x1č
x1ľ
y1
yb4a
yb3ri
yc2
ychla4dl
y4chn
y2c3p
y3de
y3di
yd3lí
y2dm
y2dn
ydoch4
ydo4chl
y3dí
ye2u1
yhla4dl
yh4na
yh4ni
y4hnu
yh4núc
y4hnúť
yh4r
y3ka
y3ke
y4kle.
y4k3lej
y4kli.
y4klo.
y4k3lom
y4klá.
y4klé
y4k3lý
y2km
y2kn
yk3ľa
y4l3al
y3lh
y4l3é4n
y2mn
ym3p
y3na
yna4st
y3ne
y3ni
y3no
y3ná
yos1
yp4c
y3pe
y3p2l
y4plo
y2pn
yp4nu
yp3ru
yp3rí
yras3
yre4tk
yri3s4
y2rm
yr1s
y3r2v
y3se
y2sf
y3si
y4ska.
ys3le
ys3li
ys2m
y2sn
y3so
yst4
y3su
y3sí
y3sú1
y2s1ľ
ys2ť
y2tc
y2tk
yt3li
y4tm
ytop3l
ytres3
yt3rý
y4tvo.
y2t1ľ
yu2
yza4d
yz2b
y3zi
y2z1m
yzo4ž
y2čm
yš2k
y4š3ka
y4šku
yš3ká
yš2l
y2šn
y3šnu
yš4te
yž2l
yž2n
za1
zab4l
zab4r
zac4
zach4c
1zad4
za3dnú
zah4
zak4tu
zam4k
1zap4
zas4
za3t2
zau4
za4ur
za3v
zav4d
zaz2
zač4ne
zač4ni
zač4nú
zaš4
zaž2
4zbed
zbo3dlo
z3bou
z3bre
2z3bá
2z1c4
z1d2c
zde4g3r
z3d4kyni
zd4kyňam
z3d4kyňo
z3d4ký
z3dlo
2zdn
zd4nam
z4dno
zd4ná
zd4ní
z3dním
z3dnít
z3dníš
z3dnúc
zdo4chl
zdo4chn
zdo4z3
zd4r
z3dra.
z4drž
z2dé
2zdí
z1d2ň
ze4b3r
2zeh
zeme3
zem3ľ
z2en
zet3l
2zf2
2zg2
z1h2
4zhab
4z3had
4zhan
4zhar
z4has
4zhat
4zhav
4zhli
4zhlo
z4hlt
4zhlú
2zhm
2zhn
z4hnedlo
z4hnil
4zhob
4zhoj
4zhor
4zhos
4zhot
4z3hove
4z3hovi
4zhoď
4zhraj
4zhral
4zhran
4zhrať
4zhrb
z4hrd
4zhrk
4zhrm
z4hro
4zhru
4zhry
4zhrá
4zhrý
4zhrč
4zhrň
z4hust
2zhy
4zhá
z3háš
2zhí
2zhô
2zhú
2zhý
2z3h4ľ
4zhŕňa.
zi4gl
2z1ih1
zi4kl
z4ink
z4ino
z2it
zi3tr
zi3vt
ziš3l
z4jav
z2jo
2z1k2
z4lat
z3lon
zláš3
zlášt4
1z2lé
1z1lý
zm2
zmog4
z1mu
2zmí
3z4nak
z4nač
4zne.
zne4tk
zne4tl
znos3m
zno4t3v
z3nou
2znu
2zny
3známu
4z3né
2znú
4z3ný
1zob
zoba4l
zo3b4l
zo3b4ral
zo3b4rať
zo3bz
1zoc
zo3ch
zoch3r
3zodn
3zo3d4r
zo3d4v
1zof
zo4fr
zo4hl
zo4h3n
3zohnan
zoh4núc
zo4h3ľ
zo1k
zo1m2
3zomel
3zomlet
zoo4p
zo3p4n
4z3o4pra
4z3o4pro
4zopru
4z3o4prá
4z3o4prí
3zo3r4v
z3o4rá
zo1s
zos4chl
3zose
3zosi
zos4k
3zosl
zos3lav
3zosme
3zosmia
3zosmu
zos4n
3zos4p
3zosta
zo4sta.
zo4s3tal
zo4s3tan
zo4s3tat
zo4s3taň
zo4s3tať
zos4ter
z3o4sti
3zostl
3zostre
4zostren
3zostrú
3zostu
3zostú
3zosá
zo4sť
zo3t2
zot4l
3zot4n
3zotret
3zotrie
zo4tro
3zotrú
3zovr
1zo1z2
zo4zl
z1oá
1zoč
1zoľ
zo1š2
3zošl
3zošt
3zože
3zoži
3zožl
3zo3žr
2z1p2
zp4r
zprs4kol
zprí3
z3pt
3z4rak
zre3dlo
z3reh
z3reč
3zrkadľ
zrovno4
2z1s2
2z1t2
z3tn
z4tnú.
1zub
zu1c
z1ud
1zul
1zum
zu3má
zu2v1
zu3vi
z1uz
zu3za
zu3ľa
zuš1
zv2
z3veh
z3vej
z3ven
z3vil
z3vis
z3vom
z3vos3
z3vov
z3vuj
3zvuk
z2vy
zvy4k3l
zvä3dlo
z1vé
z1vô
zvýs3ko
1zy
zy4čn
2z1z
1zá
zá1b
zá3ch
zá1h2
zá3kl
zá4pra
zá4ste
zá4v3r
1zé
zí1d
1zó
1zô
1zú
z1ú2h
z1ús
zú4te
zú4če
1zý
2z1č
2zď
z1ľú
2zň
2z1š2
z3še
z3ši
4zština
2z1ž2
áb3lo
á1by
áb1ľ
áce1
á4chve
áci3a
ác1l
ád1l
ád1r
á3drh
á3drž
á1du
á1dv
á1dy
á2f1
á3fo
á2gl
á2g1n
á2g1r
á2g1ľ
á1ha
á1hi
áh1l
áh1m
á1ho
á1hr
á4hra.
á4h3ry
á1hu
á1hy
á1há
áh1ľ
áh4ľad
á1ke
á1ki
á4kla.
á4k3lo
á4km
ák3re
ák3ro
ák3ru
á3kry
á1la
á1le
á1li
á1lo
álo3k4
ál1s2
á1lu
á1ly
á1lá
á1ma
á1me
ám1l
ám1r
á1mu
á1my
á1ne
á1p
á4p3lav
á4p3le
áp3li
á2pn
áp3raž
á4p3ro
á2p1ľ
á1ra
á1re
áreš3
á1ri
ári3a
ári3em
á1ro
ár1s2
á1ru
á1ry
á1rí
ás1k
ás4kl
ás1l
ás1m
ás3ta
á3s4ten
ás3tr
á3stu
ás3ty
á2s1v
ás2ť1
á1ta
átkos4t
á1tl
átos3
át1r
átri3a
á1tu
át1v
á1ty
á1tí
á1u
á1v
á2v1l
á2vt
á2v1š
á1za
á1ze
á1zi
ázi3a
áz1l
áz1n
á1zo
á1zr
á1zu
áz1v
á1á
á1ďa
á1ľ
áš1k
áš1l
áš1ť
á1ťa
áž4dn
äd1l
ä1j
ä1n
äso1
ä1ta
ät1l
äto4kr
ä1tu
ä1ty
ä1tá
ä1tí
ä1tú
ä1za
ä1ze
ä1zi
äz1n
ä1zo
ä1zu
ä1zí
ä1ťa
ä1ťo
ä4ťok
äťpo4
äť1u2
é1b
é2bl
éci3a
éd1r
é1du
é1e
ée1s2
é2fl
éf1n
é2f1r
égi1
é2g1l
é2g1r
é1h
é1k
é2km
é1l
é1m
é2mk
é2mn
é1ne
éno4g3
é1o
ép1
é1pi
épráz3
éprázd4
é1ra
é1re
é1ri
éri3a
é1ro
ér1s2
é1ru
és1
é1ta
ét1l
ét1r
é1tu
ét1ľ
é1u
év1
é1ve
é1vo
é1z
ézi1
é2z1n
é1ž
í1b
í2b1r
ích3l
ích3r
í3chy
íci3a
íc1l
íc3m
í4c3os
íd3la
íd1r
íd1ľ
í3dž
í2g1
í1ha
íh1l
í1ho
íh1v
í1j
í1ke
í3klad
ík3lo
í2km
ík1r
í3k4rat
íkri3
í3k4rov.
í1l
í1ma
í1me
í2mk
ím1l
í1mu
í1má
í1n
í1pe
í1pi
í1po
í1pr
íprav4ni
í1r
íre4š
íri3a
íri3em
í2rm
ír1s2
í4s3luž
ís1m
í1sp
í3stav
í3stre
ís3tro
í3stu
í2s1v
ís3ľ
í1t
í2tb
í2tk
í2tm
ít3ma
ít3mí
í1u
í1va
í1ve
í1vi
í1vo
í1vr
í1vu
í1vá
í1za
í1ze
í1zi
íz1l
í2zn
í1z4o
ízo4s
íz3rač
í1zu
íz3vuč
í2č1r
í1ľa
íš1ť
í1ťa
í1ťo
í1ž
í2žm
í2žn
ób1r
óch1
ód1l
ó1du
ó2f
ó3fo
ógi1
ó1le
ó1li
ó1lo
ó1ma
ó1mu
ó1ne
ó1pi
ó1po
ó1ra
ó1re
ó1ri
óri3a
ó2rm
ó1ro
ór1s2
ó1ru
ó1ta
ó2tk
ó1va
ó1ve
ó1vo
óv1r
ó1vu
ó1za
ó1zi
ózi3a
ó2z1n
ó2z1r
ó2šl
ô1ch
ôdo4z
ô1k
ô1le
ô1li
ô1lo
ô1m
ô1n
ôp1
ô1pe
ô1po
ô1ra
ô1ro
ô1sl
ôs1m
ôs4tka.
ôs4tkou
ôs4tku.
ô1t
ô2tk
ô1v
ô1za
ôz1n
ô1zo
ô1ľa
úb1r
ú1by
úb1ľ
ú1c
ú4ch3l
ú4chm
ú4chn
úch3v
úci3a
ú2cn
1úct
úd3ra
údri3
úd3ro
úd3ru
údz3n
ú2fl
úf1n
ú1h
úh3le
úh3li
úh3lo
úh4r
ú2h1ľ
ú1ke
úk1l
ú3km
úk1r
úk4ry
ú1l
ú1m
ú2na
ú1ne
ú1o
úos3t
ú1pe
ú1pi
úp3lav
ú1po
úpo4s
úp1r
ú1py2
ú1pá
ú1pä
ú1pú
ú1ra
ú4raz
ú1re
ú1ri1
ú2rm
ú1ro
úrodos4t
úrs2
ú1ru
ús1c
ús3ke
ús3ky
ú1sl
ús3lo
ús3lu
ús1m
ú4s1p
ús3ta
ús3tnu
ús3tret
ús3tri
ús3tro
ús3tí
ús1v
ú1t
ú2tc
ú3te
ú2tk
ú2tl
út3le
ú2tm
ú2tr
út3ra
út3ro
ú2t1v
ú2t1ľ
ú1v
ú2vl
úv1r2
úvrs3
ú4v3z
ú1za
úza4tk
ú1ze
ú1zi
úzi3a
úzi3em
úz1l
ú1zo
ú1zu
ú1zv
ú1zí
úz1ľ
ú1ďa
ú1ľ
úš1k
úš1ť
ú1ťa
ú1ťo
ý1b
ý2bl
ý2b1ľ
ých3l
ý1d
ýdzo4
ý1h4
ý1j
ý1k
ý2km
ý2kn
ý1l
ý1m
ý2mk
ý1n
ý1p
ýpes4
ý1r
ýri3a
ý2rm
ýr1s2
ý3sku
ý3sky
ý1s4l
ý1sm
ý1sp
ý1s2t
ý1t
ý2tk
ý2tm
ý1u
ý1v
ý2vl
ý2vt
ý1za
ý1zb
ý1z2d
ý1ze
ý1zi1
ýz1n
ý1zo
ý1zv
ý1č2n
ý1ľu
ýš1l
ýš1ľ
ý1ťa
1ča
čab3r
čach3
čad3r
čak3r
č1b
1če
čech3r
čer3t
čes3l
češ3t
češ3ť
2č1h
1či
či1c
či4žm
2č1k
4čka.
4čkam
4čke
č4kot
4čku
4čky
4čkác
1čl
2čla
2č1me
č2mo
1čmu
1čmy
1čmá
č3mám
č3mát
č3máš
č1n
4čnejš
č4net
č4neš
2čno
čno4t3v
2čná
2čné
2ční
2čný
1čo
čoch3
čo4k3r
čos4k
čo4tk
2č1p
1čr
č1ro
2č1s2
4č1t
1ču
ču1h
ču1l
ču1m
ču1t
ču1v
ču1ľ
1čv
1čá
1čí
čís3
1čó1
1čô
1čú1
1čľ
č1š
č2šm
č1ť
ďat3l
ď1k
2ďm
2ď1n
1ďo
ď1s2
2ď1t
1ďu
1ďá
ě1
ĺ1b
ĺ1d
ĺ1h
ĺk1v
ĺ1pe
ĺ1pi
ĺ1po
ĺ1ta
ĺ1za
ĺz1n
ĺ1zo
3ľach.
ľa3ct
3ľadni
3ľadní
3ľadň
ľa3kr
1ľal
ľas3t
ľa3sľ
1ľat
3ľavé
1ľaň
1ľať
ľ1b
ľ1c
ľ1d
ľdu2
ľ1h
1ľi
2ľ1k2
ľko3d4
ľkos3
2ľ1m
2ľ1n
1ľo
ľok1
4ľos
ľo4šm
2ľ1p
ľ1r
ľ1s2
ľ4ste
2ľ1t
ľu1h
ľu3v
ľu4vl
ľu3za
2ľuč
ľu4če
ľ1v
1ľá
1ľô
1ľúk
1ľún
1ľúň
2ľ1č
ľ1š4
1ň
ňa3dlo.
ňad3r
3ňam
2ňh
2ň1k
2ňm
ňo1c
ňo2h3
ňo1s
ňo1z
ňo4šm
2ň1s
2ňt
ňu1c
3ňá
ňú1
2ŕ
ŕ1h
ŕ2h1l
ŕ1l
ŕ1m
ŕ2mn
ŕ1n
ŕ1po
ŕ1ta
ŕt1v
ŕ1v
ŕ1za
ŕ1č
ŕ2čm
ŕ1ľ
ŕš3ť
ŕ1ž
ŕ2žm
ře1
1š4a
šab3l
ša1c
ša4chr
ša3dlo.
ša4fl
ša4fr
ša4fľ
š1c
1š4e
šedo4
še4h3r
šeo4c
šeo4ž
še4p3l
šepo4z3
še4p3r
še3sp
še4strav
šes3tí
šet1
še4zl
še4zm
še4z3n
1š4i
ši4dr
šies3
ši4kl
ši4km
šim1
šip1
4š3koc
4š3kom
š3kou
4š3kov
š4kovosť
š4koľ
šk4r
šk4v
š3kvi
2šky
1škô
š1la
š3lic
š3lie
šlo2
2šly
š1lá
š1lí
4šlý.
š2mo2
š1n
2š3ne
2š3no
š2nu
2šná
2š3né
2šní
š2nú
2š3ný
3šo
šom1
šor4
šo2u
šo4v3r
šp4
1šr
2š3s2
4šta.
š1t2b
š1t2c
4šte.
š4tep
šti4kl
4š3tič
š3t4kyni
št4kyňam
š3t4kyňo
š3t4ký
š3tni.
š3t4nia
š3t4nim
š3t4nit
š3t4niš
š3t4niť
4štou
2šts
1šty
4šty.
1štá
š3tál
4štár.
š3tíc
1štú
š1t2ň
1šu
šu1h
šus3
šust4
šu3ľa
šva2
š3vam
2š3vo
2švu
2švy
1šá
1šé
1š4í1
ší2c
4šíma
1šú
3šúc
šúp3l
šús1
š1č
š3ľan
š3ľav
š1ľu
š1ľú
2šň
2š1š
2šťm
2šťt
1š2ťú
1ťac
ťa3dlo.
1ťaj
1ťam
3ťan.
3ťanm
3ťano
3ťany
1ťat
ťa4vn
1ťaš
ť1b
2ť1c
2ť1d2
3ťe2
2ťf
2ť1h
ť1i
ť1j
2ť1k2
ť1l
4ť1m
ť2ni
2ťná
ť2nú
1ťoc
ť1ok
1ťom
ťo2s
4ť3ose
1ťou
ť2pa
ť1pl
2ť1po
2ť1pr2
ť1pä
2ť1r
2ť1s4
4ť1t
4ťuc
ťu1h
2ť1v
ť1z
1ťá
1ťú
ťúp1
2ť1č
ť1š
2ť1ť
1ža
ža3dlo.
ža4mk
žat3v
2žb
ž4be
4žbeta.
4žbete
4žbeto
4žbetu
4žbety
4žbetíns
ž1bl
ž1br
žbrati4
ž1c
2ž1d
žd2c
žd2ň
1že
že2h1
žem3l
3žer
že2z3
že3zi
3žeň
2žg2
1žh
1ži
žih3l
4ži4vl
živo4t3v
ži4čl
2ž1k
ž1li
ž2lo
ž1ma
2žme
2žmi
ž2mo
1žmu
ž1má
1žmú
ž1n
4ž3nej
1žo
žo1k
ž1p
ž3rav
1žri
1žrá
1žrú
4ž3rúť
2ž1s2
2ž1t
1žu
žu1v
ž1v
1žá
1žé
ží1
1žík
1žír
1žíč
1žô
1žú
ž1ďa
ž1ľ
ž2ľo
2žň
ž1š4
}
% REUSE-IgnoreEnd
